South Dakota, session 2026, SB53.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 3-12C-602 be AMENDED:
3-12C-602. A member who has left covered employment may withdraw the sum
of the member's accumulated contributions upon application to the executive director, on
a form approved by the system. If the member is married, the member's spouse must
sign the form.
A member who withdraws the member's accumulated contributions pursuant to
this section forfeits all credited service and benefits provided in this chapter.
The right to withdraw accumulated contributions ceases if the member returns to
covered employment with a participating unit.
Section 2. That § 3-12C-1208 be AMENDED:
3-12C-1208. No retirement benefit may be paid unless the system has received
a completed application for a retirement benefit, including the benefit option elected. The
application must be made to the executive director, on a form approved by the system. If
the member is married, the member's spouse must sign the form.
A member who is married is not required to obtain the signature of the member's
spouse if the member submits a completed form, in which the member certifies, under
the penalty of perjury, that the member is unable to obtain the signature of the member's
spouse because:
(1) The member does not know where the member's spouse is and has made a good
faith effort to locate the spouse; or
(2) Exceptional circumstances make it inappropriate for the member to obtain the
signature of the member's spouse.

26.553.13 2 53
If the member is unable to obtain the signature of the member's spouse for either
reason, the member must elect the sixty percent joint and survivor benefit pursuant to
§ 3-12C-1209 and provide documentation to support the assertion of subdivision (1) or
(2) of this section.
SB53 ENROLLED

26.553.13 3 53
An Act to ensure uniformity in member identification provisions governing the South Dakota
Retirement System.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 53
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 53 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB53 ENROLLED